Montana, session 2025, SB452.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Artificial intelligence disclosures for manufacturers of online media.
(1) Manufacturers of publicly distributed online media in the state that use an artificial intelligence system to
direct, control, or focus the information any one individual can see, whether entirely or in part, shall disclose the
use of the system and provide a user with the option to opt out.
(2) Any publicly distributed online media generated in whole or in part by artificial intelligence must
contain identifiable markers that alert users to the use of artificial intelligence, as well as embedded markers
that allow identification of the use of artificial intelligence should the original identifiable markers be deleted.
(3) This section does not apply to a governmental entity, as defined in 2-17-551.
(4) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Artificial intelligence" means computer systems or algorithms that can imitate human behavior
and control the flow of information or data by generating written or verbal material.
(b) "Markers" means an explicit visual or audio disclosure, including but not limited to a mark,
symbol, audio flaw, content label, watermark, byline, disclosure field, acknowledgment, disclaimer, or warning.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 30, and the provisions of Title 30 apply to [section 1].
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 452